Indiana, session 2026, HB1221.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 35-47-2.5-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.190-2006,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) This section does not apply to an item
defined as an antique firearm pursuant to 18 U.S.C. 921(a)(16).
(b) A dealer may not sell, rent, trade, or transfer from the dealer's
inventory a handgun to a person until the dealer has done all of the
following:
(1) Obtained from the prospective purchaser a completed and
signed Form 4473 as specified in section 3 of this chapter.
(2) Contacted NICS:
(A) by telephone; or
(B) electronically;
to request a background check on the prospective purchaser.
(3) Received authorization from NICS to transfer the handgun to
the prospective purchaser.
(b) (c) The dealer shall record the NICS transaction number on
Form 4473 and retain Form 4473 for auditing purposes.
2026 IN 1221—LS 6554/DI 143